Utah statutes.
20A-7-502.   Local initiative process -- Application procedures.

(1)  Persons wishing to circulate an initiative petition shall file an application with the local clerk.

(2)  The application shall contain:

(a)  the name and residence address of at least five sponsors of the initiative petition;

(b)  a statement indicating that each of the sponsors:

(i)  is a registered voter; and

(ii) (A)  if the initiative seeks to enact a county ordinance, has voted in a regular general election in Utah within the last three years; or

(B)  if the initiative seeks to enact a municipal ordinance, has voted in a regular municipal election in Utah:

(I)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(b)(ii)(B)(II), within the last three years; or

(II)  within the last five years, if the sponsor's failure to vote within the last three years is due to the sponsor's residing in a municipal district that participates in a municipal election every four years;

(c)  the signature of each of the sponsors, attested to by a notary public; and

(d)  a copy of the proposed law that includes:

(i)  the title of the proposed law, which clearly expresses the subject of the law; and

(ii)  the text of the proposed law.

(3)  A proposed law submitted under this section may not contain more than one subject to the same extent a bill may not pass containing more than one subject as provided in Utah Constitution, Article VI, Section 22.

